District of Columbia statutes.
16-579

Payments by employer-garnishee where employee has no salary or salary inadequate for services rendered.

Where the judgment debtor claims or is proved to be rendering services to or employed by a relative or other person or by a corporation owned or controlled by a relative or other person, without salary or compensation, or at a salary or compensation so inadequate as to satisfy the court that the salary or compensation is merely colorable and designed to defraud or impede the creditors of the debtor, the court may direct the employer-garnishee to make payments on account of the judgment, in installments, based upon a reasonable value of the services rendered by the judgment debtor under his employment or upon the debtor’s then earning ability.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 557, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-579.
1973 Ed., § 16-579.